Idaho statutes. Title 20 STATE PRISON AND COUNTY JAILS
Chapter 2
STATE BOARD OF CORRECTION

Sec.

§ 20-201. Department of correction created.

There is hereby created the department of correction which shall consist of the board of correction and the commission of pardons and parole. The department of correction shall, for the purposes of section 20, article IV, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, be an executive department of state government.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-201, as added by 1999, ch. 311, § 4, p. 772.

§ 20-201A. Board created — Appointment — Nonpartisan — Terms — Vacancies — Delegation of authority.

There is hereby created a nonpartisan board of three (3) members to be known as the state board of correction, referred to in this chapter as the board, appointed by the governor to exercise the duties imposed by law. The board shall be the constitutional board of correction prescribed by section 5, article X, of the constitution of the state of Idaho. Not more than two (2) members shall belong to the same political party. Any person appointed a member of the board shall hold office for six (6) years. Vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled in the same manner in which the original appointments are made.

The board may transfer to the commission of pardons and parole any and all authority and power as it deems necessary to fulfill the duties, responsibilities and intent of this chapter and the other duties imposed upon it by law.

History.

1969, ch. 97, § 2, p. 329; am. 1974, ch. 6, § 1, p. 28; am. and redesig. 1999, ch. 311, § 5, p. 772.

§ 20-202. Interim appointments — Chairman.

In the event of death, removal or resignation of any member of the board, the governor shall appoint some competent person to serve during the unexpired term. The governor shall designate one (1) member of the board to serve as chairman.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 2, p. 59; am. 1998, ch. 270, § 1, p. 899.

§ 20-203. Removal of members — Grounds — Hearing and proceedings.

The governor may not remove any member of the board except for disability, inefficiency, neglect of duty or malfeasance in office. Before such removal the governor shall give such member a written copy of the charges against him and shall fix the time when he can be heard in his defense which shall not be less than ten (10) days thereafter. If such member shall be removed, the governor shall file, in the office of the secretary of state, a complete statement of all charges made against such member and his findings thereon, with a record of the proceedings.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 3, p. 59.

§ 20-204. Political activity of board members or employees restricted.

The members of the board of correction and its officers and employees shall not, at the time of appointment nor during their incumbency of office, serve as the representative, officer, or employee of any political party.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 4, p. 59.

§ 20-205. Qualifications of board or board members.

In the selection of members of the original board, and thereafter as vacancies occur in the appointment of successor member, the governor so appointing shall, so far as same is possible, select the members on the basis of their general background in business and administration.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 5, p. 59; am. 1969, ch. 419, § 1, p. 1160.

§ 20-206. Organization of board — Election of vice-chairman and secretary, terms.

At the first meeting after they have qualified for office, the board shall proceed to organize by the election of one (1) of their members as a vice-chairman and the other as secretary. Such officers shall serve during the succeeding biennium.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 6, p. 59.

§ 20-207. Office of board at penitentiary — Meetings — Quorum — Majority vote.

The state board of correction shall maintain an office at the penitentiary and shall meet at such times and places as may be necessary for the conduct of its business. Meetings may be held at the call of the chairman or a majority of the board but in no event shall they meet less than quarterly. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and no order of the board shall be valid unless concurred in by at least two (2) of its members.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 7, p. 59; am. 1969, ch. 97, § 3, p. 329.

§ 20-208. Salaries and expenses of board members.

Each member of the state board of correction shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(q), Idaho Code.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 8, p. 59; am. 1951, ch. 217, § 1, p. 448; am. 1969, ch. 97, § 4, p. 329; am. 1980, ch. 247, § 5, p. 582; am. 2008, ch. 80, § 1, p. 208.

§ 20-209. Control and management of correctional facilities and prisoners — Rehabilitative services — Rules.

The state board of correction shall have the control, direction, and management of such correctional facilities as may be acquired for use by the state board of correction and all property owned or used in connection therewith. The board shall provide for the care and maintenance of all prisoners now or hereinafter committed to its custody. The board may also provide for employment of those prisoners housed at a correctional facility. Nothing in this section creates a right to any employment.

The state board of correction may provide or facilitate research-based rehabilitative services at the discretion of the Idaho department of correction and as resources permit for incarcerated and community-based offenders. The rehabilitative services may include programs for behavioral modification, education, vocational education, sexual offenders, substance abuse, gender responsive programs, and other programs that correctional research supports reduction of risk for offender populations. Nothing contained in this subsection shall create any right to rehabilitative services.

The state board of correction shall have the authority to enter into contracts with private prison contractors for the site selection, design, design/building, acquisition, construction, construction management, maintenance, leasing, leasing/purchasing, management or operation of private prison facilities or any combination of those services subject to the requirements and limitations set forth in section 20-241A, Idaho Code.

The state board of correction shall have the authority to promulgate rules required by law or necessary or desirable to carry out all duties assigned to the department of correction pursuant to the provisions of chapter 8, title 20, Idaho Code, which authority shall include the power and duties to prescribe standards, rules, and procedures for licensure of private prison contractors, to develop and provide, in conjunction with the department of administration, a uniform contract for use by local contracting authorities in contracting with private prison contractors, to review records and historical information of all prisoners proposed to be housed in private prison facilities and to approve or reject the housing of all prisoners, to monitor the status of insurance of private prison contractors, to approve suitable training programs for firearm certification for employees of private prison contractors, and to approve suitable drug testing programs for prisoners housed with private prison contractors. All final decisions by the board shall be subject to review pursuant to the provisions and procedures of the administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

The state board of correction is authorized to provide medical and counseling services to those prisoners who have been exposed to HIV (human immunodeficiency virus), which causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS), or who have been diagnosed as having contracted a human immunodeficiency viral disease.

The state board of correction should provide educational and informational services to prisoners housed in Idaho and to its department employees in order to assure that the transmission of HIV within correctional facilities is diminished.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 9, p. 59; am. 1970, ch. 143, § 6, p. 425; am. 1988, ch. 110, § 1, p. 199; am. 1997, ch. 223, § 1, p. 655; am. 2001, ch. 335, § 12, p. 1177; am. 2011, ch. 29, § 1, p. 71; am. 2020, ch. 223, § 1, p. 655.

§ 20-209A. Computation of term.

When a person is sentenced to the custody of the board of correction, his term of confinement begins from the day of his sentence. The time during which the person is voluntarily absent from the penitentiary, jail, facility under the control of the board of correction, or from the custody of an officer after his sentence, shall not be estimated or counted as a part of the term for which he was sentenced.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-209A, as added by 1970, ch. 143, § 7, p. 425; am. 2015, ch. 99, § 3, p. 240.

§ 20-209B. Duty to control disturbances at state penitentiary.

It shall be the primary duty of the state director of correction, or his designee, to prevent, control and suppress all riots, escapes, affrays and insurrections at the state penitentiary or other place maintained by the state board of correction which come to his knowledge, and to control and suppress all attempts to riot or escape.

The director of correction, or his designee, shall be primarily responsible for all security measures to be taken at the time of any riot, escape, affray or insurrection, or attempts to commit the same, at the state penitentiary or other place under the control of the state board of correction.

Any county sheriff, deputy sheriff or any person so acting, and all other law enforcement officers, shall be subject to the authority herein conferred upon the director of correction, or his designee, and shall be subject to his direction and control during any riots, escapes, affrays, insurrections, or attempts to commit the same, at the state penitentiary or other place maintained by the state board of correction.

Nothing in this act shall preclude the use of any county sheriff or other law enforcement officers by the director of correction during any such existing emergency. If at any such time the director of correction shall find need for the assistance of any county sheriff or other law enforcement officers, the sheriff and such other officers may respond and render assistance at the direction of the director of correction.

For purposes of this section, a facility operated by a private prison contractor and housing prisoners pursuant to a contract between the contractor and the state board of correction, as set forth in section 20-241A, Idaho Code, shall be deemed to be maintained by or under the control of the state board of correction.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-209B, as added by 1973, ch. 169, § 1, p. 358; am. 2010, ch. 351, § 2, p. 915.

§ 20-209C. Authority to designate employees as peace officers.

All employees of the state board of correction who receive peace officer certification from the Idaho peace officer standards and training council shall have the authority given by statute to peace officers of the state of Idaho in accordance with the provisions of section 19-5109, Idaho Code. The state board of correction shall have the additional authority to designate other employees to act as peace officers when engaged in transportation of prisoners or apprehension of prisoners or wards who have escaped, or apprehension and arrest of persons who are suspected of having violated the terms and conditions of their probation or parole, or when present with and at the request of a local, state or federal law enforcement officer.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-209B, as added by 1973, ch. 170, § 2, p. 359; am. and renumbered, 1979, ch. 205, § 1, p. 588; am. 1980, ch. 99, § 1, p. 219; am. 2005, ch. 131, § 3, p. 417; am. 2011, ch. 28, § 2, p. 70.

§ 20-209D. Forfeiture of contraband property or money found in possession of inmates.

The state board of correction, or its designee, shall have the authority to confiscate contraband money found in the possession of the inmates and thereafter deposit the money in the department of correction receipts account, and to dispose of other contraband property found in possession of inmates by donation to a nonprofit organization.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-209D, as added by 1979, ch. 205, § 2, p. 588; 1983, ch. 223, § 1, p. 618; am. 1989, ch. 213, § 1, p. 522.

§ 20-209E. Prison disciplinary action for frivolous or malicious court proceedings.

In any action, whether filed in state, federal or administrative court, in which a prisoner submits a frivolous or malicious claim, or knowingly testifies falsely or otherwise knowingly presents false evidence or information to the court, the prisoner may be subject to prison disciplinary action. Such disciplinary action may be initiated upon the court’s finding that:

The prisoner has filed a claim that is frivolous or malicious;

The prisoner filed a claim solely to harass the party;

The prisoner has knowingly testified falsely or otherwise knowingly submitted false evidence or information to the court; or

The prisoner has committed a fraud upon the court.

In the absence of a finding by the court under subsection (1) of this section, and upon review and recommendation by the office of the attorney general, a disciplinary hearing may be held by the appropriate authority at the prison, pursuant to section 5, article X of the constitution of the state of Idaho, to determine whether the prisoner has filed a claim that is malicious or intended solely to harass the party, or has testified falsely or otherwise presented false evidence or information to the court.

Upon a finding of guilt under either subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the prisoner shall be subject to prison disciplinary detention and loss of privileges consistent with established prison disciplinary procedures.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-209E, as added by 1996, ch. 420, § 3, p. 1398.

§ 20-209F. Warrants for certain fugitives.

The director of the department of correction or his designee shall have the authority to apply to the magistrates division of the district court of Ada county for a warrant for the arrest, detention and return to custody of any person committed to the custody of the department of correction under a judgment of conviction who, prior to satisfying the full term of his judgment of conviction and sentence, has either:

Escaped or absconded from the custody or supervision of the department; or

Been released for any reason by the department or by any law enforcement agency, department of correction or other agency in this state or another state.

The magistrate shall issue a warrant upon submission by the director or his designee of an affidavit that:

Identifies the person sought;

Demonstrates that such person has been committed to the custody of the department of correction under a judgment of conviction; and

Demonstrates that, prior to satisfying the full term of his judgment of conviction and sentence, the person sought has either:

Escaped or absconded from the custody or supervision of the department; or

Been released for any other reason by the department or by any law enforcement agency, department of correction or other agency in this state or another state.

Any person who is arrested and detained pursuant to this section shall be ineligible for bond, bail or release on his own recognizance.

Any person arrested and detained pursuant to this section shall have the right to a hearing to confirm that:

He is the person identified in the warrant; and

An unsatisfied portion of his judgment of conviction and sentence remains to be served.

A warrant issued pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until:

The warrant is quashed by order of a court;

The person identified in the warrant is returned to the custody of the department of correction; or

The sentence of the person identified in the warrant is otherwise deemed satisfied.

The issuance of a warrant pursuant to this section shall not negate or interfere with the issuance of warrants under any other provision of law.

A warrant issued pursuant to this section shall be sufficient for any peace officer to arrest, detain and return to the custody of the department of correction any person described in the warrant. It shall be the duty of all peace officers to execute the warrant in the same manner as ordinary process and to return any person arrested pursuant to this section to the custody of the department of correction.

A person who is detained pursuant to a warrant issued under this section may apply for an order quashing the warrant. An action to quash a warrant issued under this section may be brought in Ada county, Idaho or in the county in Idaho in which a person arrested under such a warrant is detained. A warrant issued under this section shall be quashed upon a showing that the person sought or detained is not the person identified in the warrant or that the person’s sentence has been completed or has otherwise been deemed satisfied.
History.

I.C.,§ 20-209F, as added by 2002, ch. 130, § 2, p. 360.

§ 20-209G. Authority to investigate and issue subpoenas.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Correctional facility” means any prison, correctional facility or mental health facility operated by the department of correction and any public or private correctional facility in which department of correction prisoners are housed pursuant to contract, including a county jail;

“Department of correction prisoner” means any person housed in a correctional facility who has been committed to the custody of or who is under the supervision of the department of correction by way of a judgment of conviction or court order, including the following:

Prisoners committed to the department to serve criminal sentences;

Persons committed in relation to their fitness to proceed at trial pursuant to section 18-212, Idaho Code;

Prisoners over whom a court has retained jurisdiction pursuant to section 19-2601 4., Idaho Code;

Prisoners serving discretionary jail time as probationers or parolees;

Parolees arrested pursuant to sections 20-227 and 20-228, Idaho Code, and are awaiting a determination regarding violation or revocation of their parole;

Civil commitments pursuant to section 66-329, Idaho Code; and

Persons committed to the Idaho security medical program pursuant to section 66-1301, Idaho Code.

“Documents” means any writings, charts, records, recordings, electronic records or data, photographs, tangible things, drawings or diagrams of any sort whatsoever.

In furtherance of the duties set forth in this chapter and department of correction rules, the director of correction shall have the authority to:

Investigate crimes, criminal enterprises or conspiracies, violations of state law or administrative regulations, disturbances, riots and the introduction of contraband into a correctional facility, where such activities involve department of correction prisoners;

Investigate waste, mismanagement of state resources and violations of laws, regulations, policies, directives or procedures by employees of the department of correction; and

Issue subpoenas for the production of documents which may be relevant to such investigations.

If a custodian of documents refuses to produce any document required by a subpoena issued pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the director of correction may petition the district court in the county in which the custodian resides or does business, setting forth by way of sworn affidavit the reasons supporting issuance of the subpoena and why the documents sought are necessary for the investigation, that due notice has been given of the time and place of production of said documents, that the custodian has been properly summoned and that the custodian has failed and refused to produce documents required by the subpoena and may request an order compelling the custodian to produce the documents.

Upon the filing of such petition and affidavit, the court shall enter an order directing the custodian of documents to appear before the court at a time fixed by the court, but not more than ten (10) court days from the date of the order, and to show cause why the custodian has not produced the documents and why he should not be required to produce the documents. The court shall serve a copy of the order upon the custodian. If it appears to the court that the petition is adequately supported by affidavit, the subpoena was regularly issued by the director of correction and regularly served upon the custodian, and that there is not good cause for the custodian’s failure to produce the documents, the court shall order the custodian to produce the required documents at a time and place fixed by the court. If the custodian fails to obey the court’s order, he shall be dealt with for contempt of court.

When documents are sought from a custodian who is not a resident of this state or who has his principal place of business in another state, the director of correction is authorized to obtain subpoenas issued by the clerk of the district court of Ada county. The clerk of the district court shall open a court file, provide a case number and issue the subpoena under the seal of the court. The subpoena shall specify those documents required to be produced.

The department of correction shall cooperate with local law enforcement and other local, state or federal law enforcement agencies during the conduct of any investigation arising out of the powers and duties set forth in this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-209G, as added by 2009, ch. 45, § 1, p. 126.

§ 20-209H. Duty to establish inmate accounts — Payment of restitution.

The state board of correction shall establish an account in the name of each inmate confined in a correctional facility. All moneys in the inmate’s possession upon admission, all moneys earned from institutional employment and all moneys received by the inmate from any other source, other than money that is contraband, shall be deposited in the inmate’s account. If the court ordered an inmate to make restitution under section 19-5304, Idaho Code, and the restitution is still owing, then twenty percent (20%) of each deposit in the inmate’s account shall be paid to the state board of correction who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such moneys to the clerk of the court in which the restitution order was entered for payment to the victim. The provisions of this section shall apply to any inmate confined in a correctional facility on or after the effective date of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-209H, as added by 2014, ch. 150, § 6, p. 414.

§ 20-209I. Assignment of inmates to do conservation work.

Inmates may be assigned to do conservation work on a permanent or temporary basis. The board or its designated agent may, at such times as it deems proper and on such terms as it deems wise, enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with any public agency, state or federal, for the performance of conservation projects that are appropriate and under conditions consistent with policies established by the board.

Inmates may be assigned to perform public conservation projects including, but not limited to, forest fire prevention and control, forest and watershed management, recreational area development, fish and game management, soil conservation, and forest watershed revegetation.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-209I, as added by 2020, ch. 83, § 12, p. 217.

§ 20-210. Commission of pardons and parole — Appointment — Qualifications — Terms — Salary — Staff.

The governor shall appoint a state commission of pardons and parole, each member of which shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate, in this chapter referred to as the commission, which shall succeed to and have all rights, powers and authority of said board of pardons as are granted and provided by the provisions of the constitution of the state of Idaho.

The commission shall be composed of seven (7) members. The members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and not more than four (4) members shall be from any one (1) political party.

The members of the commission shall be appointed for the purposes of organization as follows: Members on the commission on the effective date of this act, shall serve out the remainder of their terms; thereafter, as members’ terms expire, the governor shall reappoint them or appoint new members to serve terms of three (3) years; vacancies in the commission for unexpired terms shall be by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the term and all appointees may be reappointed.

The commission and the board may meet as necessary to exchange such information to enable each to effectively carry out their respective duties.

The commission shall meet at such times and places as determined to be necessary and convenient, or at the call of the executive director and in any event no less than quarterly.

Two (2) members of the commission may meet to make decisions on the disposition of parole violations. Such decisions must be unanimous, and in the event they are not unanimous then the parole violation disposition decision will be made by a majority of the full commission either at the next quarterly meeting or special meeting.

Three (3) members of the commission may meet to make decisions to grant or deny parole. Such decisions must be unanimous, and in the event they are not unanimous then the decision to grant or deny parole will be made by a majority of the full commission at the next quarterly meeting.

The members shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(i), Idaho Code, when attending quarterly meetings conducted at a date and time separate from a hearing session or other meetings approved by the executive director. The members shall receive compensation of three hundred dollars ($300) per member per day when conducting parole, commutation, pardon, revocation or other hearings, and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses subject to the limitations provided in section 67-2008, Idaho Code.

The governor will liberally allow the reasonable payment for services of such technical and professional advice and consultation as the commission may require. The governor shall appoint the executive director for the commission. The executive director shall be the full-time employee who shall report to, serve at the pleasure of, and be compensated as determined by the governor. The executive director shall be the official representative for the commission, shall be responsible for the managing and administration of daily commission business and shall schedule hearing sessions at times convenient to the members of the commission. For each scheduled session, the executive director shall designate one (1) of the members of the commission as the presiding officer for conducting the hearings. The executive director may hire such staff and employees as are approved by the governor. The executive director shall also have such other duties and responsibilities as the governor shall assign.
History.

1947, ch. 53, § 10, p. 59; am. 1969, ch. 97, § 5, p. 329; am. 1974, ch. 6, § 2, p. 28; am. 1980, ch. 247, § 6, p. 582; am. 1991, ch. 166, § 1, p. 406; am. 1994, ch. 171, § 1, p. 382; am. 1998, ch. 355, § 1, p. 1112; am. 1999, ch. 311, § 1, p. 772; am. 2007, ch. 102, § 1, p. 306; am. 2017, ch. 182, § 1, p. 414.

§ 20-210A. Commission of pardons and parole — Duties and powers.

The commission of pardons and parole shall:

Have the powers relating to commutation, pardon and remission of fines and forfeitures as set forth in section 7, article IV, of the Idaho constitution;

Subject to and consistent with the provisions of this chapter and section 19-2513, Idaho Code, decide whether any prisoner who is eligible for parole may be released on parole;

Subject to and consistent with the provisions of this chapter and section 19-2513, Idaho Code, and in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, promulgate rules to establish the procedures under which any eligible prisoner may be released on parole;

Specify in writing the conditions of parole for every prisoner released on parole and provide every prisoner released on parole with a copy of the conditions of parole;

Subject to and consistent with the provisions of this chapter, issue orders of final discharge from parole for eligible parolees; and

Carry out all other duties and powers relating to the commission as set forth in Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-210A, as added by 2014, ch. 150, § 7, p. 414.

§ 20-211. Records, funds and property of superseded agencies — Delivery to board of corrections [correction].

From and after the taking effect of this act, the state board of correction shall succeed to and be in possession and control of all records, accounts, books, papers, equipment, supplies, funds, and other property, real and personal, in possession of or under the control of any office, board, commission, agency, deputy or employee herein abolished or superseded. Immediately after notice of the appointment, qualification, and organization of the state board of correction, the director of correction and every other state officer or employee then having in his possession or under his control any property, real or personal, any records, and funds of whatever kind or character for the use and benefit of the penitentiary or the administration thereof, shall proceed to prepare and within ten (10) days thereafter to submit a full and complete inventory of all property and records so held to said board of correction, together with possession of said records and property as said board of correction shall direct.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 11, p. 59; am. 1974, ch. 6, § 3, p. 28.

§ 20-212. Rules — Authority of board.

The state board of correction shall make all necessary rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter not inconsistent with express statutes or the state constitution and to carry out those duties assigned to the department of correction pursuant to the provisions of chapter 8, title 20, Idaho Code. The board shall fix the time and place of meetings, the order of business, the form of records to be kept, the reports to be made, and all other rules necessary to the efficient management and control of the state penitentiary and all properties used in connection therewith. All rules of the board shall be subject to review of the legislature pursuant to sections 67-454, 67-5291 and 67-5292, Idaho Code, but no other provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, shall apply to the board, except as otherwise specifically provided by statute. When making rules required by this section, the board or the department shall submit the rules to the office of the state administrative rules coordinator, in a format suitable to the office of the state administrative rules coordinator as provided in section 67-5202, Idaho Code, and the board or department shall pay all the fees provided in section 67-5205, Idaho Code. The office of the state administrative rules coordinator is authorized and shall publish the board or department’s rules in the administrative bulletin. Additionally, whenever the board or department desires to amend, modify or repeal any of its rules, it shall follow the procedure provided in this section. All rules, or the amendment or repeal of rules shall be effective thirty (30) days after the date of publication by the office of the administrative rules coordinator. If the board determines that the rules need to be effective at a sooner date, they shall issue a proclamation indicating that the public health, safety and welfare is in jeopardy and, if the governor agrees, the rules shall be effective upon the governor signing the proclamation.

“Rule” as used in this section means the whole or a part of the board of correction or department of correction’s statement of general applicability that has been promulgated in compliance with the provisions of this section and that implements, interprets or prescribes:

Law or policy; or

The procedure or practice requirements of the board or department. The term includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule, but does not include:

Statements concerning only the internal management or internal personnel policies of an agency and not affecting private rights of the public or procedures available to the public; or

Declaratory rulings issued pursuant to statute or the board’s rules; or

Intra-department memoranda; or

Any written statements given by the department or board which pertain to an interpretation of a rule or to the documentation of compliance with a rule.
(3) At the same time that the proclamation of rulemaking is filed with the coordinator, the board or department shall provide the same notice, accompanied by the full text of the rule under consideration in legislative format, as well as a statement of the substance of the intended action, to the director of legislative services. If the rulemaking is based upon a requirement of federal law or regulation, a copy of that specific federal law or regulation shall accompany the submission to the director of legislative services. The director of legislative services shall analyze and refer the material under consideration to the germane joint subcommittee created in section 67-454, Idaho Code.

(4) The board or department shall prepare and deliver to the germane joint subcommittee a statement of economic impact with respect to a rule if the germane joint subcommittee files a written request with the board or department for such a statement. The statement shall contain an evaluation of the costs and benefits of the rule, including any health, safety, or welfare costs and benefits. The adequacy of the contents of the statement of economic impact is not subject to judicial review.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 12, p. 59; am. 1999, ch. 311, § 3, p. 772; am. 2000, ch. 228, § 1, p. 641; am. 2001, ch. 335, § 13, p. 1177.

§ 20-213. Meetings as state commission of pardons and paroles — Notice, publication, contents.

The commission shall meet at such times and places as it may prescribe, but not less than quarterly. If applications for pardon or commutation are scheduled to be considered at such meeting, notice shall be published in some newspaper of general circulation at Boise, Idaho, at least once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks, immediately prior thereto. Such notices shall list the names of all persons making application for pardon or commutation and a copy of such notice shall immediately, upon the first publication thereof, be mailed to each prosecuting attorney of any county from which any such person was committed to the penitentiary, and provided further that the commission may in its discretion consider but one (1) application for pardon or commutation from any one (1) person in any twelve (12) month period.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 13, p. 59; am. 1951, ch. 118, § 1, p. 273; am. 1969, ch. 419, § 2, p. 1160; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 1, p. 768.

§ 20-213A. Compliance with open meetings law — Executive sessions authorized — Report required.

All meetings and hearings of the commission of pardons and parole shall be held in accordance with the open meetings law as provided in chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, except:

An initial review of an application for a request for parole, pardon, commutation or firearm restoration may be held in executive session. The executive session shall be limited to a decision as to whether a hearing should be granted;

When a hearing is granted, it will be conducted in open session. Pursuant to section 74-206, Idaho Code, deliberations and voting concerning the granting, revoking, reinstating or refusing of paroles; the granting or denying of pardons or commutations; or the granting or denying of firearm restorations shall be made in executive session;

Votes of individual members in arriving at the parole, pardon, firearm restoration or commutation decisions shall not be made public, provided that the commission shall maintain a record of the votes of the individual members as required in subsection (2) of this section; and

A written record of the vote to grant or deny parole, pardon, firearm restoration or commutation by each commission member in each case reviewed by that member shall be made by the commission. The record produced by the commission pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential and privileged from disclosure, provided the record shall be made available, upon request, to the governor or the governor’s representative, the chairman and most senior minority member of the senate judiciary and rules committee and the chairman and most senior minority member of the house of representatives judiciary, rules and administration committee, for all lawful purposes. All committee members and representatives of the governor’s office shall keep such record confidential. Distribution of the report by a commissioner or an employee of the executive director to any person not specifically listed in this section shall be a misdemeanor.

Nothing contained in this section shall prevent any person from obtaining the results of any parole, pardon, firearm restoration or commutation action by the commission without reference to the manner in which any member voted, and the commission shall make such information public information.

Nothing contained herein shall prevent the executive director for the commission or designated staff of the executive director from attending any meeting, including an executive session of the commission of pardons and parole.

Nothing contained herein shall prevent the governor, the governor’s representative, chairman and most senior minority member of the senate judiciary and rules committee and the chairman and most senior minority member of the house of representatives judiciary, rules and administration committee from attending any meeting, including an executive session of the commission of pardons and parole.

[(d)](c) Meetings of less than a majority of the commission to make decisions concerning the grant or denial of parole or the disposition of parole violations as provided in section 20-210, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-213A, as added by 1986, ch. 59, § 1, p. 167; am. 1988, ch. 29, § 1, p. 37; am. 1990, ch. 213, § 14, p. 480; am. 1992, ch. 278, § 1, p. 854; am. 1994, ch. 171, § 2, p. 382; am. 2000, ch. 362, § 1, p. 1199; am. 2017, ch. 58, § 9, p. 91; am. 2017, ch. 182, § 2, p. 414; am. 2017, ch. 217, § 1, p. 532.

§ 20-214. Assistants and officers.

The state board of correction shall have power and authority to employ, to specify the training, and to fix the duties of such assistants, officers and other persons necessary for the proper and efficient administration of the department of correction and the property used in connection therewith, for the administration of the parole and probation system, and generally for the carrying out of the provisions of this act, subject to the provisions of chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 14, p. 59; am. 1974, ch. 6, § 4, p. 28; am. 2001, ch. 16, § 1, p. 20.

§ 20-215. Chairman of board succeeding to powers and duties of warden

Powers and duties. [Repealed.]